Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 5 Filing
§ 28-9-520. Acceptance and refusal to accept record.

A filing office shall refuse to accept a record for filing for a reason set forth in section 28-9-516(b)[, Idaho Code,] and may refuse to accept a record for filing only for a reason set forth in section 28-9-516(b)[, Idaho Code].

If a filing office refuses to accept a record for filing, it shall communicate to the person that presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been filed had the filing office accepted it. The communication must be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office rule but, in the case of a filing office described in section 28-9-501(a)(2)[, Idaho Code], in no event more than two (2) business days after the filing office receives the record.

A filed financing statement satisfying section 28-9-502(a) and (b)[, Idaho Code,] is effective, even if the filing office is required to refuse to accept it for filing under subsection (a) of this section. However, section 28-9-338[, Idaho Code,] applies to a filed financing statement providing information described in section 28-9-516(b)(5)[, Idaho Code,] which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

If a record communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to more than one (1) debtor, this part applies as to each debtor separately.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-520, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

Partial Effectiveness of Record.

5. Partial Effectiveness of Record. Under subsection (d), the provisions of this Part apply to each debtor separately. Thus, a filing office may reject an initial financing statement or other record as to one named debtor but accept it as to the other.

§ 28-9-521. Uniform form of written financing statement and amendment.

A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written initial financing statement in the following form and format except for a reason set forth in section 28-9-516(b), Idaho Code:

A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written record in the following form and format except for a reason set forth in section 28-9-516(b), Idaho Code:

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-521, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 18, p. 381.

§ 28-9-522. Maintenance and destruction of records.

The filing office shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed financing statement for at least one (1) year after the effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code,] with respect to all secured parties of record. The record must be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

Except to the extent that a statute governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office immediately may destroy any written record evidencing a financing statement. However, if the filing office destroys a written record, it shall maintain another record of the financing statement which complies with subsection (a) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-522, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-523. Information from filing office — Sale or license of records — Farm products — Master lists.

If a person that files a written record requests an acknowledgment of the filing, the filing office shall send to the person an image of the record showing the number assigned to the record pursuant to section 28-9-519(a)(1)[, Idaho Code,] and the date and time of the filing of the record. However, if the person furnishes a copy of the record to the filing office, the filing office may instead:

Note upon the copy the number assigned to the record pursuant to section 28-9-519(a)(1)[, Idaho Code,] and the date and time of the filing of the record; and

Send the copy to the person.

If a person files a record other than a written record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment that provides:

The information in the record;

The number assigned to the record pursuant to section 28-9-519(a)(1)[, Idaho Code]; and

The date and time of the filing of the record.

The filing office shall communicate or otherwise make available in a record the following information to any person that requests it:

Whether there is on file on a date and time specified by the filing office, but not a date earlier than three (3) business days before the filing office receives the request, any financing statement that:

designates a particular debtor;

has not lapsed under section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code,] with respect to all secured parties of record; and

if the request so states, has lapsed under section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code,] and a record of which is maintained by the filing office under section 28-9-522(a)[, Idaho Code];

The date and time of filing of each financing statement; and

The information provided in each financing statement.

In complying with its duty under subsection (c) of this section, the filing office may communicate information in any medium. However, if requested, the filing office shall communicate information by issuing a record that can be admitted into evidence in the courts of this state without extrinsic evidence of its authenticity.

The filing office shall perform the acts required by subsections (a) through (d) of this section at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office rule, but in the case of a filing office described in section 28-9-501(a)(2)[, Idaho Code], not later than two (2) business days after the filing office receives the request.

At least weekly, the filing office shall offer to sell or license to the public on a nonexclusive basis, in bulk, copies of all records filed in it under this part, in every medium from time to time available to the filing office.

The secretary of state shall maintain a central filing system containing the information filed with his office pursuant to section 28-9-502(e)[, Idaho Code]. Under this system the secretary shall record the date and time of filing and compile the information into a master list organized according to farm products. The list shall be organized within each farm product category in alphabetical order according to the last name of the borrower or, in the case of borrowers doing business other than as individuals, the first word in the name of such borrower. The list shall be further organized according to and contain information required by federal law and regulation. The secretary of state shall, by duly adopted administrative rule, designate the categories of farm products to be used in compiling the master list. The secretary of state may establish and maintain, pursuant to duly adopted administrative rule, a separate system for filing of financing statements and search, retrieval and dissemination of information relating to financing statements for farm products, and require separate search requests for such information pursuant to a fee schedule to be established in such administrative rule.
(h) The secretary of state shall maintain a list of all buyers of farm products, commission merchants, and selling agents who register with the secretary of state indicating an interest in receiving the lists described in subsection (i) of this section.

The secretary of state shall distribute complete master lists for each farm product category at least quarterly to each buyer, commission merchant and selling agent registered under subsection (h) of this section and distribute either complete lists or cumulative supplements, which supplements shall be issued not less frequently than semimonthly, of financing statements covering farm products filed subsequent to the last date of filing for financing statements on the last preceding quarterly master list, which the buyer, commission merchant or selling agent has requested. The date of receipt for lists and supplements shall be the third calendar day following the date of mailing by the secretary of state, or in the event the mail is not delivered on that day, the first day thereafter on which mail is delivered.

(j) Upon the request of any person the secretary of state shall provide, within twenty-four (24) hours, an oral confirmation of the filing of the financing statement covering farm products followed by a written confirmation.

(k) Upon request of any person, the filing officer shall furnish copies of particular filed financing statements covering farm products or statements of assignment covering farm products at a uniform cost of one dollar ($1.00) per page if the requestor provides the filing officer with the file numbers of the statement to be copied.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-523, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-524. Delay by filing office.

Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by this part is excused if:

The delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office; and

The filing office exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-524, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-525. Fees.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, the fee for filing and indexing a record under this part, other than an initial financing statement of the kind described in section 28-9-502(c)[, Idaho Code], is:

Six dollars ($6.00) if the record is communicated in writing and consists of one (1) or two (2) pages;

Twelve dollars ($12.00) if the record is communicated in writing and consists of more than two (2) pages; and

Three dollars ($3.00) if the record is communicated by another medium authorized by filing office rule.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, the fee for filing and indexing an initial financing statement of the kind described in section 28-9-502(c)[, Idaho Code,] is the amount specified in subsection (c) of this section, if applicable.

The number of names required to be indexed does not affect the amount of the fee in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

The fee for responding to a request for information from the filing office, including for issuing a certificate showing whether there is on file any financing statement naming a particular debtor, is twelve dollars ($12.00).

This section does not require a fee with respect to a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut under section 28-9-502(c)[, Idaho Code]. However, the recording and satisfaction fees that otherwise would be applicable to the record of the mortgage apply.

The secretary of state shall, by administrative rule, establish a fee schedule for filing and indexing and other matters relating to filing of financing statements covering farm products and for public access to the secretary of state’s files which are open to public inspection. A secured party shall provide an itemization of fees paid by the secured party for filing, searches or other matters related to filing of financing statements covering farm products pertaining to that debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-525, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-526. Filing office rules.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to implement this chapter. The filing office rules must be:

Consistent with this chapter; and

Promulgated in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

To keep the filing office rules and practices of the filing office in harmony with the rules and practices of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, and to keep the technology used by the filing office compatible with the technology used by filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, the secretary of state, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies and provisions of this chapter, in adopting, amending and repealing filing office rules, shall:

Consult with filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part; and

Consult the most recent version of the model rules promulgated by the international association of corporate administrators or any successor organization; and

Take into consideration the rules and practices of, and the technology used by, filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-526, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.